California statutes. Labor Code
(3) Submitted a signed statement under penalty of perjury and supporting evidence, when necessary to prove abatement, in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 6320.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 379.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6319.3.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this section and subdivision (j) of Section 6401.7, no civil penalty shall be assessed against any new employer in the state for a violation of any standard developed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 6401.7 for a period of one year after the date the new employer establishes a business in the state.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall only apply to an employer who has made a good faith effort to comply with any standard developed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 6401.7, but shall not apply if the employer is found to have committed a serious, willful, or repeated violation of that standard, or fails to abate the violation and is assessed a penalty pursuant to Section 6430.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 928, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6319.5.

Upon a showing by an employer of a good-faith effort to comply with the abatement requirement of a citation, and that abatement has not been completed because of factors beyond his reasonable control, the division, after an opportunity for a hearing, shall issue an order affirming or modifying the abatement requirements in such citation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6320.

(a) If, after inspection or investigation, the division issues a special order, order to take special action, or a citation for a serious violation, and if at the time of inspection the order is not complied with or the violation is not abated, the division shall conduct a reinspection in the following cases:

(1) All inspections or investigations involving a serious violation of a standard adopted pursuant to Section 6401.7, a special order or order to take special action, serious violations of those orders, and serious violations characterized as repeat or willful or with abatement periods of less than six days. These reinspections shall be conducted at the end of the period fixed for compliance with the order or abatement of
 the violation or within 30 days thereafter.

(2) At least 20 percent of the inspections or investigations involving a serious violation not otherwise scheduled for reinspection. These inspections shall be randomly selected and shall be conducted at the end of the period fixed for abatement of the violation or within a reasonable time thereafter.

(b) Whenever a serious violation is not abated at the time of the initial or subsequent inspection, the division shall require the employer to submit a signed statement, with supporting evidence,
 where necessary to prove abatement, under penalty of perjury, that he or she has complied with the abatement terms within the period fixed for abatement of the violation. The division may grant a modification pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 6319 only if the employer has abated the violation at the time of the initial or subsequent inspection or the statement, signed under penalty of perjury, and supporting evidence are received within 10 working days after the end of the period fixed for abatement. At no time shall the period for abatement be fixed prior to the issuance of a citation. The submission of a signed abatement statement shall not be considered as evidence of
 a violation during an appeal. The division shall include on the initial notice of civil penalty a clear warning of reinspection for failure to submit the required statement in the time allotted, and of an additional, potentially substantial monetary penalty for failure to abate the violation. If the division fails to receive evidence of abatement or the statement within 10 working days after the end of the abatement period, the division shall notify the employer that the additional civil penalty for failure to abate, as provided in Section 6430, will be assessed retroactive to the end of the abatement period unless the employer can provide sufficient evidence that the violation was abated prior to that date. The division shall conduct a reinspection of serious violations within 45 days following the end of the abatement period whenever it still has no evidence of abatement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 497, Sec. 2.   (AB 1634)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6321.

No person or employer shall be given advance warning of an inspection or investigation by any authorized representative of the division unless authorized under provisions of this part.

Only the chief or, in the case of his absence, his authorized representatives shall have the authority to permit advance notice of an inspection or investigation. The director shall, as soon as practicable, set down limitations under which an employer may be granted advance notice by the chief. In no case, except an imminent danger to the health or safety of an employee or employees, is advance notice to be authorized when the investigation or inspection is to be made as a result of an employee complaint.

Any person who gives advance notice of any inspection to be conducted, without authority from the chief or his designees, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6322.

All information reported to or otherwise obtained by the chief or representatives of the chief in connection with any inspection or proceeding of the division that contains or that might reveal a trade secret referred to in Section 1905 of Title 18 of the United States Code, or other information that is confidential pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code, shall be considered confidential, except that this information may be disclosed to other officers or employees of the division concerned with carrying out the purposes of the division or when relevant in any proceeding of the division. The appeals board, standards board, the courts, or the director shall in that type of
 proceeding issue orders as may be appropriate to protect the confidentiality of trade secrets. Violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 325.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

6323.

If the division has grounds to issue a citation pursuant to Section 6317, or if the condition of any employment or place of employment or the operation of any machine, device, apparatus, or equipment constitutes a serious menace to the lives or safety of persons about it, the division may apply to the superior court of the county in which such place of employment, machine, device, apparatus, or equipment is situated, for an injunction restraining the use or operation thereof until such condition is corrected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 336, Sec. 4.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6324.

The application to the superior court accompanied by affidavit showing that the division has grounds to issue a citation pursuant to Section 6317 or a place of employment, machine, device, apparatus, or equipment is being operated in violation of a safety order or standard or in violation of Section 25910 of the Health and Safety Code, that the use or operation constitutes a menace to the life or safety of any person
 employed thereabout, and accompanied by a copy of the statute, order, or standard applicable thereto is a sufficient prima facie showing to warrant, in the discretion of the court, the immediate granting of a temporary restraining order. A bond shall not be required from the division as a prerequisite to the granting of any restraining order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 336, Sec. 5.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6325.

(a) When, in the opinion of the division, a place of employment, machine, device, apparatus, or equipment or any part thereof is in a dangerous condition, is not properly guarded or is dangerously placed so as to constitute an imminent hazard to employees, entry therein, or the use thereof, as the case may be, shall be prohibited by the division, and a conspicuous notice to that effect shall be attached thereto. Such prohibition of use shall be limited to the immediate area in which the imminent hazard exists, and the division shall not prohibit any entry in or use of a place of employment, machine, device, apparatus, or equipment, or any part thereof, which is outside such area of imminent hazard. Such notice shall not be removed except by an
 authorized representative of the division, nor until the place of employment, machine, device, apparatus, or equipment is made safe and the required safeguards or safety appliances or devices are provided. This section shall not prevent the entry or use with the division’s knowledge and permission for the sole purpose of eliminating the dangerous conditions.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 84, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 799, Sec. 2.   (AB 2693)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Section operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6325.5.

If the division has reasonable cause to believe that any workplace contains friable asbestos, and if there appears to be inadequate protection for employees at that workplace to the hazards from airborne asbestos fibers, the division may issue an order prohibiting use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1587, Sec. 7.4.   Effective October 2, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

6326.

Every person who, after such notice is attached as provided in Section 6325, enters any such place of employment, or uses or operates any such place of employment, machine, device, apparatus, or equipment before it is made safe and the required safeguards or safety appliances or devices are provided, or who defaces, destroys or removes any such notice without the authority of the division, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), or up to one year in the county jail, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6327.

Once an authorized representative of the division has prohibited entry in or use of a place of employment, machine, device, apparatus, or equipment, as specified in Section 6325, the employer may contest the order and shall be granted, upon request, a hearing by the division to review the validity of the representative’s order. The hearing shall be held within 24 hours following the employer’s request.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1178, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6327.5.

If the division arbitrarily or capriciously fails to take action to prevent or prohibit any conditions or practices in any employment or place of employment which are such that danger exists which could reasonably be expected to cause death or serious physical harm immediately or before the imminence of such danger can be eliminated through other available means, any employee who may be injured by reason of such failure, or the representatives of such employees, may bring an action against the chief of the division in any appropriate court for a writ of mandate to compel the division to prevent or prohibit the condition. Nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to prevent the bringing of a writ of mandate against any appropriate person or entity as may be provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6328.

The division shall prepare a notice containing pertinent information regarding safety rules and regulations. The notice shall contain the address and telephone number of the nearest division office; a clear explanation of an employee’s right to report any unsafe working conditions; the right to request a safety inspection by the division for unsafe conditions; the right to refuse to work under conditions which endanger his life or health; the right to receive information under the Hazardous Substances Information and Training Act (Ch. 2.5 (commencing with Section 6360)); posting and notice requirements of employers and the division; and any other information the division deems necessary. It shall be supplied to employers as soon as practical. The division shall promulgate regulations on the content and the required location and number of notices which must be posted by employers. Sufficient posters in both English and Spanish shall be printed to supply employers in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 507, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6329.

All money collected for violation of standards, orders, or special orders of, or for fees paid pursuant to this division shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the General Fund.

The Department of Industrial Relations shall account to the Department of Finance and the State Controller for all moneys so received and furnish proper vouchers therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6330.

The director shall prepare and submit to the Legislature, not later than March 1, an annual report on the division activities. The report shall include, but need not be limited to, the following information for the previous calendar year:

(a) The amount of funds allocated and spent in enforcement, education and research, and administration by the division.

(b) Total inspections made, and citations issued by the division.

(c) The number of civil penalties assessed, total amount of fines collected and the number of appeals heard.

(d) The number of contractors referred to the Contractor’s State License Board for hearing, pursuant to Section 7109.5 of the Business and Professions Code, and the total number of these cases resulting in suspension or revocation of a license.

(e) The report from the division prepared by the Bureau of Investigations for submission to the director pursuant to Section 6315.3.

(f) Recommendations for legislation which improves the ability of the division to provide safety in places of employment.

The report shall be made to the Speaker of the Assembly and the Chairman of the Rules Committee of the Senate, for assignment to the appropriate committee or committees for evaluation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1317, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

6331.

The division shall enter into a contract for the development and execution of tests to define safety standards for the use of positive pressure, closed circuit, breathing apparatus in interior structural fires. The testing shall define numerically what constitutes positive pressure in breathing apparatus. The testing shall also address the issues of the heat of the oxygen coming into the mask, the condensation inside the mask, the possibility of, and effect of, moisture condensation in the lungs of the wearer of the mask, and the risks associated with a dislodgement of the mask in an interior structural fire situation. The development of these tests shall utilize the resources of recognized specialists in fire research to design, conduct, and execute the tests and develop the standards. The standards board shall adopt or revise safety standards based on the results of these tests.

The test parameters, the location where the testing will take place, and the level of expertise required shall be determined by the Cal-OSHA Self Contained Breathing Apparatus Advisory Committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1571, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6332.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Community health care worker” means an individual who provides health care or health care-related services to clients in home settings.

(2) “Employer” means a person or entity that employs a community health care worker. “Employer” does not include an individual who is a recipient of home-based services and who is responsible for hiring his or her own community health care worker.

(3) “Violence” means a physical assault or a threat of a physical assault.

(b) Every employer shall keep a record of any violence committed against a community health care worker and shall file a copy of that record with the department in the form and detail and within the time limits prescribed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 107.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Education and Research [6350. - 6359.]

6350.

The division shall maintain an education and research program for the purpose of providing in-service training of division personnel, safety education for employees and employers, research and consulting safety services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6351.

The division shall be responsible for preparation and distribution of information concerning occupational safety and health programs, methods, techniques or devices. Such information may include but is not limited to safety publications, films and audiovisual material, speeches and conferences on safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6352.

The division shall provide safety training programs, upon request, for employees and employers. Priority for the development of safety training programs shall be in those occupations which pose the greatest hazard to the safety and health of employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6353.

The division shall conduct continuing research into methods, means, operations, techniques, processes and practices necessary for improvement of occupational safety and health of employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6354.

The division shall, upon request, provide a full range of occupational safety and health consulting services to any employer or employee group. These consulting services shall include:

(a) A program for identifying categories of occupational safety and health hazards causing the greatest number and most serious preventable injuries and illnesses and workers’ compensation losses and the places of employment where they are occurring. The hazards, industries, and places of employment shall be identified from the data system that is used in the targeted inspection program pursuant to Section 6314.1. The division shall develop procedures for offering consultation services to high hazard employers who are identified pursuant to this section. The services may include the development of educational material and procedures for reducing or eliminating safety and health hazards, conducting workplace surveys to identify health and safety problems, and development of plans to improve employer health and safety loss records.

The program shall include a component for reducing the number of work-related, repetitive motion injuries, including, but not limited to, back injuries. The division may formulate recommendations for reducing repetitive motion injuries after conducting a survey of the workplace of the employer who accepts services of the division. The recommendations shall include, wherever appropriate, the application of generally accepted ergonomic and engineering principles to eliminate repetitive motions that are generally expected to result in injuries to workers. The recommendations shall also include, wherever appropriate, training programs to instruct workers in methods for performing job-related movements, such as lifting heavy objects, in a manner that minimizes strain and provides safeguards against injury.

The division shall establish model injury and illness prevention training programs to prevent repetitive motion injuries, including recommendations for the minimum qualifications of instructors. The model programs shall be made available to employers, employer associations, workers’ compensation insurers, and employee organizations on request.

(b) A program for providing assistance in the development of injury prevention programs for employees and employers. The highest priority for the division’s consulting services shall be given to development of these programs for businesses with fewer than 250 employees in industries identified in the regional plans developed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6314.1.

(c) A program for providing employers or employees with information, advice, and recommendations on maintaining safe employment or place of employment, and on applicable occupational safety and health standards, techniques, devices, methods, practices, or programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 903, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

6354.5.

(a) Any insurer desiring to write workers’ compensation insurance shall maintain or provide occupational safety and health loss control consultation services. The insurer may employ qualified personnel to provide these services or provide the services through another entity.

(b) The program of an insurer for furnishing loss control consultation services shall be adequate to meet minimum standards prescribed by this section. Required loss control consultation services shall be adequate to identify the hazards exposing the insured to, or causing the insured, significant workers’ compensation losses, and to advise the insured of steps needed to mitigate the identified workers’ compensation losses or exposures. The program of an insurer for furnishing loss control consultation services shall provide all of the following:

(1) A workplace survey, including discussions with management and, where appropriate, nonmanagement personnel with permission of the employer.

(2) A review of injury records with appropriate personnel.

(3) The development of a plan to improve the employer’s health and safety loss control experience, which shall include, where appropriate, modifications to the employer’s injury and illness prevention program established pursuant to Section 6401.7. At the time that an insurance policy is issued and annually thereafter, and again when notified by Cal-OSHA that an insured employer has been identified as a targeted employer pursuant to Section 6314.1, the insurer shall provide each insured employer with a written description of the consultation services together with a notice that the services are available at no additional charge to the employer. These notices to the employer shall appear in at least 10-point bold type.

(c) The insurer shall not charge any fee in addition to the insurance premium for safety and health loss control consultation services.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require insurers to provide loss control services to places of employment that do not pose significant preventable hazards to workers.

(e) The director shall establish an insurance loss control services coordinator position in the Department of Industrial Relations. The coordinator shall provide information to employers about the availability of loss control consultation services and respond to employers’ questions and complaints about loss control consultation services provided by their insurer. The coordinator shall notify the insurer of every complaint concerning loss control consultation services. If the employer and the insurer are unable to agree on a mutually satisfactory solution to the complaint, the coordinator shall investigate the complaint. Whenever the coordinator determines that the loss control consultation services provided by the insurer are inadequate or inappropriate, he or she shall recommend to the employer and the insurer the actions required to bring the loss control program into compliance. If the employer and the insurer are unable to agree on a mutually satisfactory solution to the complaint, the coordinator shall forward his or her recommendations to the director. The cost of providing the coordinator services shall be paid out of the Workers’ Occupational Safety and Health Education Fund created by subdivision (a) of Section 6354.7. However, no more than 20 percent of that fund may be expended for this purpose each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 83.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6354.7.

(a) The Workers’ Occupational Safety and Health Education Fund is hereby created as a special account in the State Treasury. Proceeds of the fund may be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, by the Commission on Health and Safety and Workers’ Compensation for the purpose of establishing and maintaining a worker occupational safety and health training and education program and an insurance loss control services coordinator. The director shall levy and collect fees to fund these purposes from insurers subject to Section 6354.5. However, the fee assessed against any insurer shall not exceed the greater of one hundred dollars ($100) or 0.0286 percent of paid workers’ compensation indemnity amounts for claims as reported for the previous calendar year to the designated rating organization for the analysis required under subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 11759.1 of the Insurance Code. All fees shall be deposited in the fund.

(b) The commission shall establish and maintain a worker safety and health training and education program. The purpose of the worker occupational safety and health training and education program shall be to promote awareness of the need for prevention education programs, to develop and provide injury and illness prevention education programs for employees and their representatives, and to deliver those awareness and training programs through a network of providers throughout the state. The commission may conduct the program directly or by means of contracts or interagency agreements.

(c) The commission shall establish an employer and worker advisory board for the program. The advisory board shall guide the development of curricula, teaching methods, and specific course material about occupational safety and health, and shall assist in providing links to the target audience and broadening the partnerships with worker-based organizations, labor studies programs, and others that are able to reach the target audience.

(d) The program shall include the development and provision of a needed core curriculum addressing competencies for effective participation in workplace injury and illness prevention programs and on joint labor-management health and safety committees. The core curriculum shall include an overview of the requirements related to injury and illness prevention programs and hazard communication.

(e) The program shall include the development and provision of additional training programs for any or all of the following categories:

(1) Industries on the high hazard list.

(2) Hazards that result in significant worker injuries, illnesses, or compensation costs.

(3) Industries or trades in which workers are experiencing numerous or significant injuries or illnesses.

(4) Occupational groups with special needs, such as those who do not speak English as their first language, workers with limited literacy, young workers, and other traditionally underserved industries or groups of workers. Priority shall be given to training workers who are able to train other workers and workers who have significant health and safety responsibilities, such as those workers serving on a health and safety committee or serving as designated safety representatives.

(f) The program shall operate one or more libraries and distribution systems of occupational safety and health training material, which shall include, but not be limited to, all material developed by the program pursuant to this section.

(g) The advisory board shall annually prepare a written report evaluating the use and impact of programs developed.

(h) The payment of administrative costs incurred by the commission in conducting the program shall be made from the Workers’ Occupational Safety and Health Education Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 866, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6355.

If the employer requests or accepts consulting services offered pursuant to Section 6354, the division in providing such services at the employer’s employment or place of employment shall neither institute any prosecution under Section 6423 nor issue any citations for a violation of any standard or order adopted pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 140) of Division 1. In any instance in which the division representative providing the consulting service finds that the conditions of employment, place of employment, any work procedure, or the operation of any machine, device, apparatus, or equipment constitutes an imminent hazard or danger, within the meaning of Section 6325, to the lives, safety, or health of employees, entry therein, or the use thereof, as the case may be, shall be prohibited by the division pursuant to Section 6325. The employer shall not, however, be liable to prosecution under Section 6423, nor shall the division issue any citations or assess any civil penalties, except in any case where the employer fails to comply with the division’s prohibition of entry or use, or in any case where the provisions of Section 6326 apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 121, Sec. 70.   Effective July 16, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6356.

(a) There is hereby created, in the General Fund, the Worker Safety Bilingual Investigative Support, Enforcement, and Training Account. The moneys in the account may be expended by the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of this part.

(b) The department may receive and accept a contribution of funds from an individual or private organization, including the proceeds from a judgment in a state or federal court, if the contribution is made to carry out the purposes of this part. The department shall immediately deposit the contribution in the account established by subdivision (a).

(c) The department may not receive or accept a contribution of funds under this section made from the proceeds of a judgment in a criminal action filed pursuant to Section 6423 or 6425 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 885, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6357.

On or before January 1, 1995, the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board shall adopt standards for ergonomics in the workplace designed to minimize the instances of injury from repetitive motion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 121, Sec. 71.   Effective July 16, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6359.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) Every year 70 adolescents die from work injuries in the United States and 200,000 are injured, 70,000 seriously enough to require hospital treatment. Most of these injuries are preventable.

(2) A recent report by the Institute of Medicine and the National Research Council has brought national attention to the need for better education and interventions to aid injury and illness prevention efforts aimed at young workers.

(3) Since 1996, the California Study Group on Young Workers’ Health and Safety, consisting of 30 representatives from key agencies and organizations involved with California youth employment and education issues, including representatives from government agencies, business, labor, parent and teacher organizations, and others, has met to develop recommendations to better protect and educate California’s young workers.

(4) The study group recommended the establishment of a Resource Network on Young Workers’ Health and Safety, to assist in increasing the ability of young workers and their communities to identify and address workplace hazards in order to prevent young workers from becoming injured or ill on the job.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Industrial Relations, the University of California, the State Department of Education, the State Department of Health Services, and the Employment Development Department cooperatively and individually conduct activities aimed at the prevention of occupational injuries and illnesses among young workers.

(c) The Department of Industrial Relations shall contract with a coordinator to establish a statewide young worker health and safety resource network. The primary function of the resource network shall be to assist in increasing the ability of young workers and their communities statewide to identify and address workplace hazards in order to prevent young workers from becoming injured or ill on the job. The network shall coordinate and augment existing outreach and education efforts and provide technical assistance, education materials and other support to schools, job training programs, employers and other organizations working to educate students and their communities about workplace health and safety and child labor laws.

(d) The resource network shall provide, and the lead center shall coordinate, services to all key groups throughout the state involved in education and protecting young workers, including, but not limited to:

(1) Teachers.

(2) Schools.

(3) Job training programs.

(4) Employers of youth.

(5) Parent groups.

(6) Youth organizations.

(7) Work permit issuers.

(e) The resource network shall be advised by a statewide advisory group, including, but not limited to, representatives from the Department of Industrial Relations, the Commission on Health and Safety and Worker’s Compensation, the University of California, the State Department of Education, the Department of Health Services, and the Employment Development Department, as well as business, labor, parents, and others experienced in working with youth doing agricultural and nonagricultural work. The advisory group shall represent diverse geographic regions of the state.

(f) This section shall be implemented subject to the availability of funding for the purposes of this section in the 2000–01 Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 598, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.2. Artificial Stone; Occupational Exposure to Respirable Crystalline Silica [6359.1. - 6359.5.]

6359.1.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Artificial stone” means any reconstituted, artificial, synthetic, composite, engineered, or manufactured stone product. It is commonly made by combining natural stone or other crystalline silica-containing materials with adhesives, polymers, epoxies, resins, or other binding materials to form a slab. Fired ceramic and porcelain tiles and panels are not artificial stone. 

(b) “Department” means the Department of Industrial Relations.

(c) “Director” means the Director of Industrial Relations.

(d) “Division”
 means the Division of Occupational Safety & Health.

(e) “Dry methods” means the undertaking of high-exposure trigger tasks without the use of wet methods that effectively suppress dust.

(f) (1) “Fabrication shop” means a person, entity, business, or location where high-exposure trigger tasks are undertaken.

(2) “Fabrication shop” does not include quarries, concrete and cement manufacturing facilities, or fired ceramic or fired porcelain tiles or panels manufacturing facilities that do not manufacture, fabricate, or finish artificial stone products.

(g) “High-exposure trigger task” means machining, crushing, cutting, drilling, abrading, abrasive blasting, grinding, chiseling, carving, gouging, polishing, buffing, fracturing,
 intentional breaking, or intentional chipping of artificial stone that contains more than 0.1 percent by weight crystalline silica, or other silica containing products, including natural stone, that contain more than 10 percent by weight crystalline silica. High-exposure trigger tasks also include clean up, disturbing, or handling of wastes, dusts, residues, debris, or other materials created during the above-listed tasks. High-exposure trigger tasks do not include tasks other than the fabrication of countertops, backsplashes, walls, flooring, waterfall countertop edges, and other products from slabs or panels.

(h) “Respirable crystalline silica” means quartz, cristobalite, or tridymite contained in airborne particles that are determined to be respirable by a sampling device designed to meet the characteristics for respirable-particle-size-selective samplers specified in the International Organization for Standardization (ISO) 7708:1995 Air
 Quality — Particle Size Fraction Definitions for Health-Related Sampling.

(i) “Wet methods” means effectively suppressing dust by one of the methods listed below, such that exposures do not exceed the action level at any time. Regardless of the method used, water shall cover the entire surface of the work object where a tool, equipment, or machine contacts the work object.

(1) Applying a constant, continuous, and appropriate volume of running water directly onto the surface of the work object. When water flow is integrated with a tool, machine, or equipment, water flow rates shall equal or exceed manufacturer recommendations and specifications to ensure effective dust suppression. Any water that is recycled must be filtered to remove silica prior to reuse.

(2) Submersing the work object underwater.

(3) Water jet cutting or the use of high-pressure water to cut material.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 734, Sec. 3.   (SB 20)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6359.1.5.

(a) A person or entity engaged in high-exposure trigger tasks shall not use dry methods when engaging in any high-exposure trigger tasks.

(b) A person or entity engaged in high-exposure trigger tasks shall use effective wet methods when engaging in any high-exposure trigger tasks.

(c) A violation of this section shall be grounds for an immediate order by the division prohibiting continued work and shall be grounds for penalties as set forth in Division 5 and Chapters 3.2, 3.3, 3.5, 4, and 7 of Division 1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(d) The division shall enforce this section by issuing a
 citation alleging a violation of this section and a notice of civil penalty in a manner consistent with Section 6317. Any person who receives a citation and penalty may appeal the citation and penalty to the appeals board in a manner consistent with Section 6319.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 734, Sec. 3.   (SB 20)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6359.2.

(a) The owner or operator of a fabrication shop, or any individual who will employ another individual to perform high-exposure trigger tasks in a fabrication shop, shall do both of the following:
